District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1513

Registration — Offices.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-59, § 14, 24 DCR 5975
July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-38, § 80(f), 41 DCR 3010
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1234, 46 DCR 3142

History

1981 Ed., § 2-113.
1973 Ed., § 2-953.

Prior Codifications

Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1501.

Editor's Notes